Utah statutes.
58-69-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.

Grounds for division action regarding the following are under Section 58-1-401:

(1)  refusing to issue a license to an applicant or refusing to renew the license of a licensee;

(2)  revoking, suspending, restricting, or placing on probation the license of a licensee;

(3)  issuing a public or private reprimand to a licensee; and

(4)  issuing a cease and desist order.

